Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.090

Schedules of property and liabilities—Inventory of property—Appraisals.

(1) In the event of a general assignment of property for the benefit of creditors under chapter 7.08 RCW, the assignment shall have annexed as schedule A a true list of all of the person's known creditors, their mailing addresses, the amount and nature of their claims, and whether their claims are disputed; and as schedule B a true list of all property of the estate, including the estimated liquidation value and location of the property and, if real property, a legal description thereof, as of the date of the assignment.

(2) In all other cases, within thirty-five days after the date of appointment of a general receiver, the receiver shall file as schedule A a true list of all of the known creditors and applicable regulatory and taxing agencies of the person over whose assets the receiver is appointed, their mailing addresses, the amount and nature of their claims, and whether their claims are disputed; and as schedule B a true list of all property of the estate identifiable by the receiver, including the estimated liquidation value and location of the property and, if real property, a legal description thereof, as of the date of appointment of the receiver.

(3) The schedules must be in substantially the following forms:

SCHEDULE A—CREDITOR LIST

1. List all creditors having security interests or liens, showing:

Name

Address

Amount

Collateral

Whether or not disputed

2. List all wages, salaries, commissions, or contributions to an employee benefit plan owed, showing:

Name

Address

Amount

Whether or not disputed

3. List all consumer deposits owed, showing:

Name

Address

Amount

Whether or not disputed

4. List all taxes owed, showing:

Name

Address

Amount

Whether or not disputed

5. List all unsecured claims, showing:

Name

Address

Amount

Whether or not disputed

6. List all owners or shareholders, showing:

Name

Address

Percentage of Ownership

7. List all applicable regulatory agencies, showing:

Name

Address

SCHEDULE B—LIST OF PROPERTY

List each category of property and for each give approximate value obtainable for the asset on the date of assignment/appointment of the receiver, and address where asset is located.

I. Nonexempt Property

Description and Location

Liquidation Value on Date of Assignment/Appointment of Receiver

1.

Legal Description and street address of real property, including leasehold interests:

2.

Fixtures:

3.

Cash and bank accounts:

4.

Inventory:

5.

Accounts receivable:

6.

Equipment:

7.

Prepaid expenses, including deposits, insurance, rents, and utilities:

8.

Other, including loans to third parties, claims, and choses in action:

II. Exempt Property

Description and Location

Liquidation Value on Date of Assignment/Appointment of Receiver

I DECLARE under penalty of perjury under the laws of the state of Washington that the foregoing is true, correct, and complete to the best of my knowledge. DATED this . . . day of . . . . . . . ., . . . ., at . . . . . . . ., state of . . . . . . . ..

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

[SIGNATURE]

(4) When schedules are filed by a person making a general assignment of property for the benefit of creditors under chapter 7.08 RCW, the schedules shall be duly verified upon oath by such person.

(5) The receiver shall obtain an appraisal or other independent valuation of the property in the receiver's possession if ordered by the court.

(6) The receiver shall file a complete inventory of the property in the receiver's possession if ordered by the court.

[ 2011 c 34 s 3; 2004 c 165 s 11.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.